dictionaries/gl_ES/index.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -aáàâãäeéêèiïìíîoóòôõöuùúûübcçdfghjklmnñpqrstvxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNÑOPQRSTUVWXYZÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙÏÜÇ·
FLAG num
NEEDAFFIX 666
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjklñ|zxcvbnm|qaw|saz|wse|dsx|sz|edr|fdc|dx|rft|gfv|fc|tgz|hgb|gv|zhu|jhn|hb|uji|kjm|jn|iko|lkmñ|plñç
NOSPLITSUGS
KEEPCASE 999
WORDCHARS -'
MAP 21
MAP aá
MAP eé
MAP ií
MAP oó
MAP uú
MAP iï
MAP uü
MAP ie
MAP íé
MAP uo
MAP úó
MAP bv
MAP lr
MAP ye
MAP yi
MAP yx
MAP xs
MAP zc
MAP nñ
MAP s-
MAP r-
SFX 10 Y 10
SFX 10 0 s [^lrsz] . is:plural
SFX 10 0 es [lr] . is:plural
SFX 10 0 es [^áéíóú]s . is:plural
SFX 10 ás ases ás . is:plural
SFX 10 és eses és . is:plural
SFX 10 ís ises [^aeiou]ís . is:plural
SFX 10 0 es [aeiou]ís . is:plural
SFX 10 ós oses ós . is:plural
SFX 10 ús uses ús . is:plural
SFX 10 z ces z . is:plural
SFX 11 Y 3
SFX 11 0 s [ry] . is:plural
SFX 11 0 es r . is:plural
SFX 11 y ies y . is:plural
SFX 12 Y 3
SFX 12 l is [^íi]l . is:plural
SFX 12 il ís il . is:plural
SFX 12 l s íl . is:plural
SFX 13 Y 7
SFX 13 ácter acteres carácter . is:plural
SFX 13 omon ómones gnomon . is:plural
SFX 13 eu ei leu . is:plural
SFX 13 0 a lev . is:plural
SFX 13 0 er lied . is:plural
SFX 13 0 s troll . is:plural
SFX 13 0 s quilohertz . is:plural
SFX 14 Y 2
SFX 14 0 a . is:feminino
SFX 14 0 as . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 Y 18
SFX 15 o a o . is:feminino
SFX 15 e a e . is:feminino
SFX 15 án á án . is:feminino
SFX 15 ón oa ón . is:feminino
SFX 15 ún úa ún . is:feminino
SFX 15 ín ina ín . is:feminino
SFX 15 és esa és . is:feminino
SFX 15 or riz tor . is:feminino
SFX 15 dor triz dor . is:feminino
SFX 15 o as o . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 e as e . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 án ás án . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 ón oas ón . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 ún úas ún . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 ín inas ín . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 és esas és . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 or rices tor . is:feminino plural
SFX 15 dor trices dor . is:feminino plural
SFX 16 Y 6
SFX 16 án ana án . is:feminino
SFX 16 ón ona ón . is:feminino
SFX 16 ao á ao . is:feminino
SFX 16 án anas án . is:feminino plural
SFX 16 ón onas ón . is:feminino plural
SFX 16 ao ás ao . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 Y 32
SFX 17 ao á mao . is:feminino
SFX 17 an a [sv]an . is:feminino
SFX 17 ó oa [sv]ó . is:feminino
SFX 17 u úa [rn]u . is:feminino
SFX 17 eu ía deu . is:feminino
SFX 17 ún una euscaldún . is:feminino
SFX 17 an á chan . is:feminino
SFX 17 que ca turuleque . is:feminino
SFX 17 ónsul onsulesa cónsul . is:feminino
SFX 17 0 sa conde . is:feminino
SFX 17 e ina margrave . is:feminino
SFX 17 0 ha un . is:feminino
SFX 17 ún unha ún . is:feminino
SFX 17 eu úa seu . is:feminino
SFX 17 ao ás mao . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 an as [sv]an . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 ó oas [sv]ó . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 u úas [rn]u . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 eu ías deu . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 ún unas euscaldún . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 an ás chan . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 ónsul onsulesas cónsul . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 0 sas conde . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 e inas margrave . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 que cas turuleque . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 0 has un . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 ún unhas ún . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 eu úas seu . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 os as [^l]os . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 os as llos . is:feminino plural
SFX 17 olos alas olos . is:feminino
SFX 17 ous úas dous . is:feminino
SFX 30 Y 4
SFX 30 o a o . is:feminino
SFX 30 o as o . is:feminino plural
SFX 30 0 s o . is:plural
SFX 30 o amente o . ds:adverbio deadxectival
SFX 98 Y 8
SFX 98 r -la r . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo feminino singular tras -r
SFX 98 r -las r . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo feminino plural tras -r
SFX 98 r -lo r . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo masculino singular tras -r
SFX 98 r -los r . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo masculino plural tras -r
SFX 98 s -la s . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo feminino singular tras -s
SFX 98 s -las s . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo feminino plural tras -s
SFX 98 s ·lo s . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo masculino singular tras -s
SFX 98 s -los s . po:artigo determinado pa:alomorfo masculino plural tras -s
SFX 100 Y 12
SFX 100 0 a [^sr] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 feminino singular
SFX 100 0 as [^sr] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 feminino plural
SFX 100 0 o [^sr] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 masculino singular
SFX 100 0 os [^sr] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 masculino plural
SFX 100 r la r . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino singular tras -r
SFX 100 r las r . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino plural tras -r
SFX 100 r lo r . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino singular tras -r
SFX 100 r los r . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino plural tras -r
SFX 100 s la s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino singular tras -s
SFX 100 s las s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino plural tras -s
SFX 100 s lo s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino singular tras -s
SFX 100 s los s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino plural tras -s
SFX 101 Y 4
SFX 101 0 na [iu] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino singular tras ditongo decrecente
SFX 101 0 nas [iu] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo feminino plural tras ditongo decrecente
SFX 101 0 no [iu] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino singular tras ditongo decrecente
SFX 101 0 nos [iu] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico acusativo P3 alomorfo masculino plural tras ditongo decrecente
SFX 104 Y 8
SFX 104 0 me . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P1
SFX 104 0 che . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P2
SFX 104 0 lle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P3
SFX 104 s nos mos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P4
SFX 104 0 nos [^o]s . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P4
SFX 104 0 nos [^s] . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P4
SFX 104 0 vos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P5
SFX 104 0 lles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico monosílabo P3 / P6 intransitiva dativo P6
